Utah statutes.
63M-1-404.   Criteria for designation of enterprise zones -- Application.

(1)  A county applicant seeking designation as an enterprise zone shall file an application with the office that, in addition to complying with the other requirements of this part:

(a)  verifies that the county has a population of not more than 50,000; and

(b)  provides clear evidence of the need for development in the county.

(2)  A municipal applicant seeking designation as an enterprise zone shall file an application with the office that, in addition to complying with other requirements of this part:

(a)  verifies that the municipality is a city of the fifth class or a town;

(b)  verifies that the municipality is within a county that has a population of not more than 50,000; and

(c)  provides clear evidence of the need for development in the municipality.

(3)  An application filed under Subsection (1) or (2) shall be in a form and in accordance with procedures approved by the office, and shall include the following information:

(a)  a plan developed by the county applicant or municipal applicant that identifies local contributions meeting the requirements of Section 63M-1-405;

(b)  the county applicant or municipal applicant has a development plan that outlines:

(i)  the types of investment and development within the zone that the county applicant or municipal applicant expects to take place if the incentives specified in this part are provided;

(ii)  the specific investment or development reasonably expected to take place;

(iii)  any commitments obtained from businesses;

(iv)  the projected number of jobs that will be created and the anticipated wage level of those jobs;

(v)  any proposed emphasis on the type of jobs created, including any affirmative action plans; and

(vi)  a copy of the county applicant's or municipal applicant's economic development plan to demonstrate coordination between the zone and overall county or municipal goals;

(c)  the county applicant's or municipal applicant's proposed means of assessing the effectiveness of the development plan or other programs within the zone once they have been implemented within the zone;

(d)  any additional information required by the office; and

(e)  any additional information the county applicant or municipal applicant considers relevant to its designation as an enterprise zone.

